Connecticut, session 2026, SB00327.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section, (1)
2 "emergency medical condition" means a medical condition, including
3 emergency labor and delivery, manifesting itself by acute symptoms of
4 sufficient severity, including severe pain, such that the absence of
5 immediate medical attention could reasonably be expected to result in
6 (A) placing the patient's health in serious jeopardy, (B) serious
7 impairment to bodily functions, or (C) serious dysfunction of any bodily
8 organ or part; and (2) "emergency Medicaid coverage" means Medicaid
9 coverage for treatment of an emergency medical condition.
10 (b) The Commissioner of Social Services shall expand emergency
11 Medicaid coverage consistent with federal law for treatment of
12 emergency medical conditions, including, but not limited to, emergency
13 medical conditions related to (1) a high-risk pregnancy, (2) diabetes type
14 1 in persons under the age of twenty-one, (3) diabetic emergencies,
15 including, but not limited to, diabetic ketoacidosis, (4) renal failure
SB327 / File No. 460 1

SB327 File No. 460
16 requiring ongoing dialysis, (5) fracture of a bone in the skull, arm, neck,
17 leg, spine or pelvis occurring in the two-month period prior to a request
18 for emergency Medicaid coverage, (6) hypertensive emergencies
19 involving persons presenting with signs or symptoms of end organ
20 damage and systolic blood pressure equaling or exceeding one hundred
21 eighty or diastolic blood pressure equaling or exceeding one hundred
22 twenty, (7) unstable seizure disorder characterized by at least five
23 minutes of uncontrollable seizures or at least two discrete seizures
24 between which the person does not regain consciousness, (8) active
25 treatment for cancer related to a current diagnosis, (9) ventilator
26 dependency, (10) labor and delivery, and (11) acute inpatient or
27 outpatient psychiatric treatment.
28 (c) Not later than July 1, 2027, the commissioner shall establish an
29 administrative system for persons to apply in advance for emergency
30 Medicaid coverage for emergency medical conditions that can be
31 treated in outpatient settings rather than in hospital emergency
32 departments. The commissioner shall include a prominent link to the
33 application and a list of covered emergency medical conditions on the
34 Internet web site of the Department of Social Services. The
35 commissioner shall also include information about advance
36 applications for emergency Medicaid coverage and a list of covered
37 emergency medical conditions in department forms and policy
38 manuals.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
HS Joint Favorable
SB327 / File No. 460 2

SB327 File No. 460
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Social Services, Dept. GF - Cost at least See Below
$250,000
Resources of the General Fund GF - Revenue at least See Below
Gain $125,000
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a cost to the Department of Social Services (DSS)
associated with expanding coverage of emergency Medicaid services
and requiring DSS to establish an administrative system for individuals
to apply in advance for emergency Medicaid coverage by 7/1/27.
DSS will incur administrative costs of at least $250,000 in FY 27 to
establish a registration system for individuals with qualifying
emergency medical conditions that can be treated in outpatient settings
rather than in hospital emergency departments. These costs are
anticipated to be eligible for federal reimbursement, resulting in a
federal grants revenue gain of at least $125,000.
The fiscal impact of expanding the definition of emergency medical
condition cannot be determined at this time. For context, the state
currently spends approximately $30 million on emergency Medicaid
services (representing a 50% share of total expenditures), which are
generally emergent in nature and include outpatient dialysis for
individuals with end-stage renal disease. Emergency Medicaid
SB327 / File No. 460 3

SB327 File No. 460
coverage is available to all individuals, regardless of immigration status,
who meet Medicaid income and asset limits.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the utilization and coverage of
services under emergency Medicaid.
SB327 / File No. 460 4

SB327 File No. 460
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 327
AN ACT EXPANDING EMERGENCY MEDICAID COVERAGE.